Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 2. Home Rule Limitations.

Sec. 29.10.200.
Limitation of home rule powers.

Only the following provisions of this title apply to home rule municipalities as prohibitions on acting otherwise than as provided. These provisions supersede existing and prohibit future home rule enactments that provide otherwise:

AS

29.05.140

(transition);

AS

29.06.010

(change of municipal name);

AS

29.06.040

—

29.06.060

(annexation and detachment);

AS

29.06.090

—

29.06.170

(merger and consolidation);

AS

29.06.190

—

29.06.420

(unification of municipalities);

AS

29.06.450

—

29.06.530

(dissolution);

AS

29.10.100

(charter amendment);

AS

29.20.010

(conflict of interest);

AS

29.20.020

(meetings public);

AS

29.20.050

(legislative power);

AS

29.20.060

—

29.20.120

(assembly composition and apportionment);

AS

29.20.140

(qualifications of members of governing bodies);

AS

29.20.150

(term of office);

AS

29.20.220

(executive power);

AS

29.20.270(e)

(ordinance veto by mayor);

AS

29.20.630

(prohibited discrimination);

AS

29.20.640

(reports);

AS

29.25.010(a)(10)

(municipal exemption on contractor bond requirements);

AS

29.25.050

(codification);

AS

29.25.060

(resolutions);

AS

29.25.070(e)

and (f) (penalties);

AS

29.25.074

(surcharge);

AS

29.25.080

(breast-feeding);

AS

29.26.030

(notice of elections);

AS

29.26.050

(voter qualification);

AS

29.26.250

—

29.26.360

(recall);

AS

29.35.020

(extraterritorial jurisdiction);

AS

29.35.030

(eminent domain);

AS

29.35.050(a)

— (c) (garbage and solid waste services);

AS

29.35.055

(local air quality control program);

AS

29.35.060

(franchises and permits);

AS

29.35.070

(public utilities);

AS

29.35.080

(alcoholic beverages);

AS

29.35.090(b)

(certain vacations of rights-of-way prohibited);

AS

29.35.120

(post audit);

AS

29.35.125

(fees for police protection services);

AS

29.35.131

—

29.35.137

(enhanced 911 system);

AS

29.35.141

(regulation of radio antennas);

AS

29.35.144

(sprinkler fire protection systems);

AS

29.35.145

(regulation of firearms and knives);

AS

29.35.146

(images captured by unmanned aircraft systems);

AS

29.35.147

(licensing of massage therapists);

AS

29.35.148

(regulation of transportation network companies or drivers).

AS

29.35.149

(regulation of dextromethorphan);

AS

29.35.160

(education);

AS

29.35.170(b)

(assessment and collection of taxes);

AS

29.35.180(b)

(land use regulation);

AS

29.35.250

(cities inside boroughs);

AS

29.35.260

(cities outside boroughs);

AS

29.35.340

(acquisition of areawide power);

AS

29.35.450

(service areas);

AS

29.35.500

—

29.35.590

(hazardous materials and wastes);

AS

29.40.160(a)

— (c) (title to vacated areas);

AS

29.40.200

(subdivisions of state land);

AS

29.45.010

—

29.45.560

and

29.45.800

(property taxes);

AS

29.45.650(c)

, (d), (e), (f), (i), (j), and (k) (sales and use tax);

AS

29.45.700(d)

, (e), and (g) (sales and use tax);

AS

29.45.750

(taxation of mobile telecommunications);

AS

29.45.810

(exemption from municipal taxation);

AS

29.45.820

(air carriers);

AS

29.46.010(b)

(exemption from municipal assessment);

AS

29.47.200(b)

(security for bonds);

AS

29.47.260

(revenue bonds);

AS

29.55.100

—

29.55.165

(energy improvement assessment programs);

AS 29.65 (general grant land);

AS

29.71.040

(procurement preference for state agricultural and fisheries products);

AS

29.71.050

(procurement preference for recycled Alaska products).

History.

(§ 6 ch 74 SLA 1985; am §§ 1, 2 ch 38 SLA 1986; am § 6 ch 70 SLA 1986; am § 12 ch 80 SLA 1986; am § 3 ch 108 SLA 1986; am § 49 ch 14 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 30 SLA 1988; am § 2 ch 63 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 64 SLA 1988; am § 3 ch 57 SLA 1993; am § 5 ch 74 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 29 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 75 SLA 1997; am § 7 ch 56 SLA 1998; am § 3 ch 78 SLA 1998; am § 4 ch 104 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 107 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 94 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 19 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 31 SLA 2001; am § 2 ch 100 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 111 SLA 2002; am §§ 1, 2 ch 117 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 55 SLA 2005; am §§ 1, 2 ch 80 SLA 2005; am § 14 ch 12 SLA 2008; am § 1 ch 40 SLA 2009; am § 43 ch 41 SLA 2009; am § 1 ch 26 SLA 2011; am § 4 ch 54 SLA 2013; am § 3 ch 105 SLA 2014; am § 6 ch 114 SLA 2014; am § 2 ch 16 SLA 2016; am § 111 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 7 ch 10 SLA 2017; am § 1 ch 25 SLA 2017)

Conditional repeal of paragraph (58) [originally enacted as (62)]. —

Under § 6,
ch. 100, SLA 2002, paragraph (58) [originally enacted as (62)] is repealed. Under § 9,
ch. 100, SLA 2002, this repeal is effective only “if a court of competent jurisdiction whose decisions are binding in this state enters a final judgment on the merits that is based on federal law, is no longer subject to appeal or petition for certiorari, and substantially limits or impairs the essential elements of
4 U.S.C. 116 — 126.” Under § 11,
ch. 100, SLA 2002, the effective date of the repeal is “the day after the last day on which the judgment described in § 9 . . . could have been appealed.” As of May 2022, this contingency had not occurred.

Revisor's notes. —

Reorganized in 1986, 1998, 2001, 2002, 2011, 2014, 2016, and 2017 to retain numerical order of the referenced provisions.

The reference to “AS

29.25.074

” in paragraph (22) was substituted for “AS

29.25.072

” in 1998 to reflect the 1998 renumbering of that section. The reference to “AS

29.45.820

” in paragraph (54) [now paragraph (60)] was substituted for “AS

29.47.470

” to reflect the 2008 renumbering of that section.

In 2020, the reference in paragraph 21 to “ AS

29.25.070

(e) and (f)” was substituted for “ AS

29.25.070

(e) and (g)” to reflect the relettering of that section.

Cross references. —

Section 3, 2014 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, provides that “[t]he provisions of this Act are independent and severable, and, except where otherwise indicated in the text, shall supersede conflicting statutes, local charter, ordinance, or resolution, and other state and local provisions.”

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to paragraph (21), see sec. 185(a)(36), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective September 16, 2003, added subsection references in paragraphs (51) and (52) [now (54) and (55)].

The first 2005 amendment, effective September 22, 2005, added section references in paragraph (37).

The second 2005 amendment, effective July 20, 2005, inserted subsection references in paragraphs (51) and (52) [now (54) and (55)].

The 2008 amendment, effective April 9, 2008, repealed paragraphs (59) and (60) [now (62) and (63)], which referred to AS 29.60.050(a) and AS 29.60.120(a) and (c), respectively.

The first 2009 amendment, effective September 18, 2009, in (29), substituted “AS

29.35.050(a)

— (c)” for “AS

29.35.050

”.

The second 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, in (46) [now (47)], deleted “voter approval of alteration or abolishment of” preceding “service areas”; in (50) [now (51)], substituted “AS

29.45.010

—

29.45.560

and

29.45.800

” for “AS

29.45.010

—

29.45.570

”; in (57) [now (60)], substituted “(revenue bonds)” for “(construction)”; in (59) and (60) [now (62) and (63)], deleted repeal information, and redesignated (61) through (63) [now (64) — (66)] as (59) through (61) [now (62) — (64)] respectively.

The 2011 amendment, effective October 11, 2011, added (39).

The 2013 amendment, effective September 18, 2013, in (40) added “and knives” at the end.

The first 2014 amendment, effective October 26, 2014, added (63) [now (41)].

The second 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, added (63) [now (42)].

The first 2016 amendment, effective June 3, 2016, added (65) [now (44)]. Although the 2016 amendments were to have taken effect May 1, 2016 under § 4, ch. 16, SLA 2016, the governor did not sign the bill until June 2, 2016, and so the actual effective date of the 2016 amendments was June 3, 2016, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

The second 2016 amendment, effective June 3, 2016, substituted “and (g) (penalties)” for “(notices of certain civil actions)” in (21).

The 2017 amendment, effective September 8, 2017, added (b)(6), and made a related change.

The second 2017 amendment, effective September 8, 2017, also added (66) [now (64)].